Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.020

Humane societies—Enforcement authority.

Any citizens of the state of Washington incorporated under the laws of this state as a humane society or as a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals may enforce the provisions of this chapter through its animal control officers subject to the limitations in RCW 16.52.015 and 16.52.025. The legislative authority in each county may grant exclusive authority to exercise the privileges and authority granted by this section to one or more qualified corporations for a period of up to three years based upon ability to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1994 c 261 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 125 s 1; 1901 c 146 s 1; RRS s 3184.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.